Tennessee, session 114, SB2368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The state treasurer shall use existing resources to conduct a study of the
use of public funds by neighboring states to facilitate gender transition procedures. The
purpose of the study is to determine what restrictions neighboring states place upon public
funding of gender transition procedures. The state treasurer shall compile the findings of the
study into a report and transmit the report to the chief clerk of the senate, the chief clerk of the
house of representatives, and the legislative librarian no later than December 31, 2026. The
state treasurer may publish and transmit the report by electronic means.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2368
012592
- 1 -